Maryland, session 2025, HB0670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 26. CIVIL ACTIONS FOR SENDING UNSOLICITED OBSCENE MATERIAL.
3–2601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “OBSCENE MATERIAL” MEANS MATERIAL THAT, TAKEN AS A
WHOLE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0670*

HOUSE BILL 670
(I) AN AVERAGE ADULT, APPLYING CONTEMPORARY
COMMUNITY STANDARDS, WOULD FIND APPEALS TO THE PRURIENT INTEREST;
(II) DEPICTS OR DESCRIBES SEXUAL CONDUCT IN A WAY THAT
IS PATENTLY OFFENSIVE TO PREVAILING STANDARDS IN THE ADULT COMMUNITY;
AND
(III) LACKS SERIOUS ARTISTIC, EDUCATIONAL, LITERARY,
POLITICAL, OR SCIENTIFIC VALUE.
(2) “OBSCENE MATERIAL” INCLUDES IMAGES OR VIDEO DEPICTING A
PERSON ENGAGING IN AN ACT OF SEXUAL INTERCOURSE, SODOMY, ORAL
COPULATION, SEXUAL PENETRATION, OR MASTURBATION, OR DEPICTING THE
EXPOSED GENITALS OR ANUS OF ANY PERSON.
(C) “UNSOLICITED” MEANS THE RECIPIENT HAS NOT CONSENTED TO OR
HAS EXPRESSLY FORBIDDEN THE RECEIPT OF THE IMAGE OR VIDEO.
3–2602.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER, A MOBILE DATA PROVIDER, OR
AN OPERATOR OF AN ONLINE OR MOBILE APPLICATION, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
ENTITY IS TRANSMITTING, ROUTING, OR PROVIDING CONNECTIONS FOR
ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS INITIATED BY OR AT THE DIRECTION OF ANOTHER
PERSON;
(2) ANY SERVICE THAT TRANSMITS IMAGES OR AUDIOVISUAL WORKS,
INCLUDING AN ON–DEMAND, SUBSCRIPTION, OR ADVERTISING–SUPPORTED
SERVICE; OR
(3) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER TRANSMITTING AN IMAGE FOR A
LEGITIMATE MEDICAL PURPOSE.
3–2603.
A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY SEND BY ELECTRONIC MEANS TO ANOTHER
PERSON AN IMAGE OR A VIDEO CONTAINING OBSCENE MATERIAL THAT THE SENDER
KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW IS UNSOLICITED.
3–2604.

HOUSE BILL 670 3
(A) A PERSON WHO SUFFERS HARM AS A RESULT OF RECEIVING AN IMAGE
OR A VIDEO IN VIOLATION OF § 3–2603 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BRING AN ACTION
FOR ECONOMIC AND NONECONOMIC DAMAGES PROXIMATELY CAUSED BY THE
RECEIPT OF THE IMAGE OR VIDEO, INCLUDING DAMAGES FOR EMOTIONAL
DISTRESS.
(B) IF THE RECEIPT OF THE IMAGE OR VIDEO IN VIOLATION OF § 3–2603 OF
THIS SUBTITLE WAS EXPRESSLY FORBIDDEN BY THE PERSON BRINGING AN ACTION
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERSON MAY ADDITIONALLY SEEK AND BE AWARDED,
ON REQUEST AND BEFORE THE FINAL JUDGMENT IS RENDERED:
(1) STATUTORY DAMAGES NOT EXCEEDING $30,000 AND NOT LESS
THAN $1,500; AND
(2) PUNITIVE DAMAGES.
(C) A PERSON BRINGING AN ACTION UNDER THIS THIS SUBTITLE MAY ALSO
SEEK AND BE AWARDED:
(1) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES;
(2) COURT COSTS;
(3) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(4) ANY OTHER AVAILABLE RELIEF.
(D) THE REMEDIES PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION ARE CUMULATIVE AND MAY
NOT BE CONSTRUED AS RESTRICTING ANY OTHER REMEDY THAT IS AVAILABLE
UNDER LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.